Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5207YH (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2182 Section 1. Section 97B.42A, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. A retired member who is a certified 3 law enforcement officer and is reemployed by a law enforcement 4 agency as a school resource officer may elect out of coverage 5 by filing an election with the system within sixty days of 6 reemployment. A decision to elect out of coverage pursuant to 7 this subsection is irrevocable upon approval from the system. 8 If a person elects out of coverage pursuant to this subsection, 9 the period of time from the date on which the person was newly 10 hired until the date the personâs election out of coverage is 11 effective shall not constitute service for purposes of coverage 12 under this chapter. In addition, a wage adjustment shall be 13 processed for the person based on any contributions collected 14 pursuant to this chapter during that period of time and shall 15 be credited pursuant to section 97B.10. 16 Sec. 2. Section 97B.48A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 17 by adding the following new paragraph: 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. Beginning July 1, 2026, the reduction in 19 a memberâs retirement allowance under this subsection shall not 20 apply to a member who is a certified law enforcement officer 21 and is reemployed by a law enforcement agency as a school 22 resource officer. 23 Sec. 3. Section 97B.52A, subsection 1, paragraph c, 24 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended by adding the following 25 new subparagraph division: 26 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (e) For a member who is a 27 certified law enforcement officer and whose first month 28 of entitlement is July 2026 or later, any employment with 29 a covered employer or covered employment does not include 30 employment by a law enforcement agency as a school resource 31 officer. 32 Sec. 4. Section 411.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 33 following new subsection: 34 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. A retired member who is reemployed 35 -1- LSB 5207YH (3) 91 sc/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2182 by a law enforcement agency as a school resource officer may 1 continue to receive a service retirement allowance during the 2 period of reemployment. The retirement allowance shall not be 3 recalculated based upon the personâs reemployment. 4